Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.280

Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, intra-agency memorandums.

Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or recommended are exempt under this chapter, except that a specific record is not exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.

[ 2005 c 274 s 408.]